Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5750.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 224g. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, beginning January 1, 2027, a person shall not sell, offer for sale, or possess in this state a magazine capable of holding more than 10 rounds of ammunition. (2) A person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both.